apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
    <pardef n="mia__det">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jn</l>               <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dem__det">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jn</l>               <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ambaŭ__det">
      <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ind__det">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jn</l>               <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quant__det">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l>                <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jn</l>               <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ajna">                           <i>ajna</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="alia">                           <i>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ambaŭ">                          <i>ambaŭ</i><par n="ambaŭ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="certa">                          <i>certa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">                            <i>ĉiu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ĉiu">                            <i>ĉiu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="diversa">                        <i>diversa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ĝia">                            <i>ĝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ilia">                           <i>ilia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ioma">                           <i>ioma</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="iu">                             <i>iu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kelka">                          <i>kelka</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="la alia">                        <i>la<b/>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="la sama">                        <i>la<b/>sama</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="la tuta">                        <i>la<b/>tuta</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="lia">                            <i>lia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="malmulta">                       <i>malmulta</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="mia">                            <i>mia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="multa">                          <i>multa</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="neniu">                          <i>neniu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nia">                            <i>nia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="plura">                          <i>plura</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ŝia">                            <i>ŝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tia">                            <i>tia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tiu">                            <i>tiu</i><par n="dem__det"/></e>
    <e lm="via">                            <i>via</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
